fst/lexc/sgx_functional.txt
Multichar_Symbols
+P
+PRO
PN
ASSOC
PROX
DIST
PL_
+DEM
AX
1SG.III.WK
1PL.III.WK
2SG.III.WK
2PL.III.WK
3.III.WK
1SG.III.OBL
1PL.III.OBL
2SG.III.OBL
2PL.III.OBL
3.III.OBL
1SG.III.STRG
1PL.III.STRG
2SG.III.STRG
2PL.III.STRG
3.III.STRG

LEXICON Root
	Preposition ;
	WeakPronoun ;
	OblPronoun ;
	StrongPronoun ;
	NProclitic ;
	SeriesI ;
	SeriesIprocl ;

LEXICON Preposition
P: ał 	Word;
P: ts'm	Word;

LEXICON WeakPronoun
1SG.III.WK+PRO:'nu 	Word ;
1PL.III.WK+PRO:'nm	Word ;
2SG.III.WK+PRO:n 	Word ;
2PL.III.WK+PRO:nsm 	Word ;
3.III.WK+PRO:0 		Word ;

LEXICON OblPronoun
1SG+OBL:k'oy 	Word ;
1PL+OBL:k'am	Word ;
2SG+OBL:k'wan 	Word ;
2PL+OBL:k'wasm 	Word ;
3+OBL:'niit 		Word ;

LEXICON StrongPronoun
1SG.III.STRG+PRO:'nüüyu  	Word ;
1PL.III.STRG+PRO:'nüüm	Word ;
2SG.III.STRG+PRO:'nüün 	Word ;
2PL.III.STRG+PRO:'nüüsm 	Word ;
3.III.STRG+PRO:'niit 		Word ;

LEXICON NProclitic
PN:t		# ;
PN:t		DemonstrativeClitic ;
ASSOC:dip	# ;
ASSOC:dip	DemonstrativeClitic ;

LEXICON DemonstrativeClitic
=PROX+DEM:=un	Word ;
=DIST+DEM:=ust	Word ;
